Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2004
District court judgment; grounds for vacation or modification; determination.

The court may first try and decide upon the grounds to vacate or modify a judgment or order, before trying or deciding upon the validity of the defense or cause of action.

R.S.1867, Code § 605, p. 501;

R.S.1913, § 8210;

C.S.1922, § 9163;

C.S.1929, § 20-2004;

R.S.1943, § 25-2004.

Court should not try out merits of controversy at same time it determines whether or not a valid cause of action or defense has been presented. Miller v. Schlereth, 151 Neb. 33, 36 N.W.2d 497 (1949).

Attempt of county court to vacate judgment in civil action after term, without notice, was void. Stone v. Jensen, 118 Neb. 254, 224 N.W. 284 (1929).

Court should hear evidence on petition to vacate before entry of order. Trimble & Blackman v. Corey & Son, 78 Neb. 639, 111 N.W. 376 (1907).

General finding is sufficient in absence of request for special findings. Anthony & Co. v. Karbach, 64 Neb. 509, 90 N.W. 243 (1902).

It is not necessary to tender an answer with a motion to vacate. Fisk v. Thorp, 60 Neb. 713, 84 N.W. 79 (1900).